District of Columbia statutes.
3-403

Repealed

Board of Funeral Directors; duties of Mayor; duties of Board; compensation of Board.

Repealed.

May 22, 1984, D.C. Law 5-84, § 4, 31 DCR 1815
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 28, 35 DCR 147
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 134, 47 DCR 520
1981 Ed., § 2-2803.
Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 5-84, see Mayor’s Order 87-186, August 3, 1987.